Maryland, session 2025, HB0993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER” MEANS THE LEGAL PENALTIES THAT TAKE AWAY AN INDIVIDUAL’S
FREEDOM, RIGHTS, AND ACCESS TO PROGRAMS OR SERVICES AFTER CONVICTION
FOR MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201(A)(4) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AGE–APPROPRIATE CURRICULUM
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0993*

HOUSE BILL 993
STANDARDS FOR A COURSE ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE
STATE.
(C) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A CURRICULUM BASED ON THE
CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER CURRICULUM STANDARDS
DEVELOPED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT A COURSE ON THE
CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER IS TAUGHT TO STUDENTS
AT LEAST ONCE DURING GRADES 6 THROUGH 8.
(D) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.